Hawaii statutes.
§142-93 Harboring mongoose; penalty.
Any person harboring, feeding, or in any way caring for a mongoose, except upon
and according to the terms of a written permit which may be granted therefor by
the department of agriculture, in its discretion, to scientists, scientific
institutions, associations, or colleges, or to officers, boards, or commissions
of the State or any county, shall be penalized pursuant to section 142-12. [L
1907, c 137, §7; RL 1925, §680; RL 1935, §258; am L 1937, c 185, §2; RL 1945, §1097;
RL 1955, §20-92; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS §142-93;
am L 1986, c 8, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next